Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1356.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 531. Restriction on the Use of REAL ID.--(a) The Commonwealth, or any agency or political subdivision, may not require the presentation or use of a REAL ID-compliant identification in order to access any public building or to procure a government service or file a governmental form.(b) For the purposes under subsection (a), the presentation or use of a driver's license from the Commonwealth or another state, a non-driver photo identification from the Commonwealth or another state or another similar form of identification shall suffice as a form of identification.(c) Nothing under this section shall be construed to require an identification to be demanded for access to a building or for acceptance of a form, if no other reason exists for requiring an identification.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1356PN1544 - 2 - 123456789101112131415